Hawaii statutes.
[§342I-7] Entry and inspection of records.
The director of health may enter and inspect any building or place for the
purpose of:

(1) Investigating an actual or suspected violation of
this part;

(2) Conducting reasonable tests;

(3) Taking samples; and

(4) Reviewing and copying records. [L 1991, c 201, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next